docs/src-fst-morphology-stems-prefixes.lexc.md
Prefixes
Prefixes in the Southern Puget Sound Salish language are attached to the beginning of other words.

Beck, David 2018: Aspectual Affixation in Lushootseed: A minor reanalysis
ordering
Tense/mood | Poss.subj | nominalizers | Aspect | Stem | Object/voice | others
gʷə%<, ƛ̕u%<, tu%<, ɬu%<, bə%< | d%<, ad%< |s%<, dəxʷ%< | ʔu, ʔəs, lə, ləs, ləcu| X |%>s/%>bš, %>sut/%>ut, %>agʷəl, %>b |%>ləp, %>s, %>əxʷ

-1/-4?(lə=bə=ʔas-q̓ʷəl-il) proclitic Asp/Prog+:lə%<
@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@ƛ̕u%<  (+Hab)
@U.TAM-T.REM@:@U.TAM-T.REM@tu%<   (TM/Past+)
@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@:@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@ɬu%<  (+Fut)
@U.TAM-RE.RE@:@U.TAM-RE.RE@bə%<  (+Add)
-1 aspect
@U.TAM-A.PROG@:@U.TAM-A.PROG@lə%<  (non-circumscribed, progressive)
@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-A.STAT@ʔəs%<  (ongoing state: Asp/Stat)
@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-A.STAT@ʔas%<  (ongoing state: Asp/Stat)variant
@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@:@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@ləs%< (Asp/ProgStat)
@U.TAM-A.PFV@:@U.TAM-A.PFV@ʔu%<  (Asp/Pfv)
-1 Asp/Cont+:ləcu%< (?Asp/Prog+:lə%< + Asp/Pfv+:ʔu%<) Skagit
-1 Asp/Stat:ʔə{sØ}{dØ}xʷ%< (Asp/Stat+:ʔəs%< + dxʷ%<)

X
1 %>s/%>bš, %>sut/%>ut, %>agʷəl, %>b, +Inch:%>il
2 %>ləp, +Px3:%>s, %>əxʷ
lə<bə<ləcu<gʷaadgʷad

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/prefixes.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-slh/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/prefixes.lexc)</small>

---
